Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.766

Loan program for mathematics and science teachers—Duration—*Legislative budget committee review.

No loans shall be made after August 23, 1989, until the program is reviewed by the *legislative budget committee and is reenacted by the legislature.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 74 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "legislative budget committee" was redesignated the "joint legislative audit and review committee" by 1996 c 288 s 3.

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 74: See note following RCW 28B.15.760.